zh-CN: 响板包含部件: 一对（2 件）; 一对 + 琴盒; 一对 + 备用绳/带; 单个 - 左手; 单个 - 右手; 其他
bg-BG: Включени части на кастанетите: Чифт (2 части); Чифт + калъф; Чифт + допълнителни шнурове/връзки; Единични – за лява ръка; Единични – за дясна ръка; Други
sv: Delar som ingår med kastanjetter: Par (2 delar); Par + fodral; Par + extra snören/remmar; Enkel – vänster; Enkel – höger; Övrigt
de: Enthaltene Teile der Kastagnetten: Paar (2 Stück); Paar + Etui; Paar + extra Schnüre/Bänder; Einzeln - links; Einzeln - rechts; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Kastanety sú súčasťou balenia: Pár (2 kusy); Pár + puzdro; Pár + náhradné šnúrky/remienky; Jeden kus – ľavá; Jeden kus – pravá; Iné
da: Antal dele inkluderet i kastagnetter: Par (2 stk.); Par + æske; Par + ekstra snore/stropper; Enkelt – venstre; Enkelt – højre; Andet
ko: 포함된 캐스터네츠 구성품: 1쌍(2개); 1쌍 + 케이스; 1쌍 + 추가 코드/스트랩; 단일 - 왼쪽; 단일 - 오른쪽; 기타
ja: カスタネットに含まれる部品: ペア (2個); ペア + ケース; ペア + 予備コード/ストラップ; シングル - 左; シングル - 右; その他
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi v kastanjete: Par (2 kosa); Par + kovček; Par + dodatne vrvice/paščki; Enojna – leva; Enojna – desna; Drugo
fr: Éléments inclus avec les castagnettes: Paire (2 pièces); Paire + étui; Paire + cordons/courroies supplémentaires; Simple - gauche; Simple - droite; Autre
en: Castanets included pieces: Pair (2 pieces); Pair + case; Pair + extra cords/straps; Single - left; Single - right; Other
fi: Kastanjettisetin sisältämät osat: Pari (2 osaa); Pari + kotelo; Pari + lisänarut/-hihnat; Yksittäinen – vasen; Yksittäinen – oikea; Muu
it: Le nacchere includevano pezzi: Coppia (2 pezzi); Coppia + custodia; Coppia + cordoncini/cinturini extra; Singola - sinistra; Singola - destra; Altro
cs: Kastaněty součástí balení: Pár (2 kusy); Pár + pouzdro; Pár + extra šňůrky/popruhy; Jeden kus – levý; Jeden kus – pravý; Jiné
nl: Castanets meegeleverde stukken: Paar (2 stuks); Paar + doos; Paar + extra koorden/bandjes; Enkel - links; Enkel - rechts; Overig
nb: Kastanjetter inkluderte brikker: Par (2 stk.); Par + etui; Par + ekstra snorer/stropper; Enkel – venstre; Enkel – høyre; Annet
ro-RO: Castaniete incluse piese: Pereche (2 bucăți); Pereche + cutie; Pereche + șnururi/curele suplimentare; O bucată - stânga; O bucată - dreapta; Altele
es: Componentes incluidos de las castañuelas: Par (2 piezas); Par + estuche; Par + cordones/correas adicionales; Individual: izquierda; Individual: derecha; Otro
hr-HR: Kastanjete uključene u dijelove: Par (2 komada); Par + kutija; Par + dodatne uzice/trake; Pojedinačno – lijevo; Pojedinačno – desno; Ostalo
zh-TW: 包含響板件數: 一對 (2 件); 一對 + 收納盒; 一對 + 備用綁繩/綁帶; 單個 - 左; 單個 - 右; 其他
lt-LT: Įtrauktos kastanječių dalys: Pora (2 dalys); Pora + dėklas; Pora + papildomos virvelės / dirželiai; Vienas – kairysis; Vienas – dešinysis; Kita
th: อุปกรณ์ที่รวมมากับกรับสเปน: คู่ (2 ชิ้น); คู่ + เคส; คู่ + เชือก/สายรัดเสริม; ชิ้นเดียว - ซ้าย; ชิ้นเดียว - ขวา; อื่นๆ
hu: Kasztanyettákhoz biztosított elemek: Pár (2 darab); Pár + tok; Pár + extra zsinórok / pántok; Egy darab – balos; Egy darab – jobbos; Egyéb
pl: Elementy kastanietów w zestawie: Para (2 sztuki); Para + futerał; Para + dodatkowe sznurki/paski; Pojedyncza - lewa; Pojedyncza - prawa; Inne
pt-PT: Peças incluídas nas castanholas: Par (2 peças); Par + estojo; Par + cordões/alças adicionais; Individual - esquerda; Individual - direita; Outro
ru: Комплектация кастаньет: Пара (2 шт.); Пара + футляр; Пара + дополнительные шнурки/ремешки; Одна — левая; Одна — правая; Другое
tr: Kastanyet dahil parçalar: Çift (2 parça); Çift + kılıf; Çift + ekstra kordon/kayış; Tek - sol; Tek - sağ; Diğer
el: Κομμάτια καστανιέτας που περιλαμβάνονται: Ζεύγος (2 τεμάχια); Ζεύγος + θήκη; Ζεύγος + επιπλέον κορδόνια/λουριά; Μονό - αριστερό; Μονό - δεξί; Άλλο
pt-BR: Peças incluídas com as castanholas: Par (2 peças); Par + estojo; Par + cordões/tiras extras; Unitário - esquerda; Unitário - direita; Outros
vi: Số lượng castanet đi kèm: Một cặp (2 chiếc); Một cặp + hộp; Một cặp + dây/dây đai phụ; Một chiếc - trái; Một chiếc - phải; Khác